Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
CHAPTER 57 Public Printing and Distribution of Public Documents

57.010.
Superintendent of Public Printing; appointment, qualifications. [Repealed.]

57.011.
State printing done under contract — Classes of printing.

The printing and binding of the laws, journals, and agency reports, and all other such public printing and binding shall be performed under contract. Printing contracts shall be divided into two (2) classes and defined as follows:

First-class printing is the printing of all bills for the General Assembly together with such matters as are ordered by either or both houses to be printed in bill form and the printing and binding of the journals of the two (2) houses, printing and binding of the volumes of public documents and of the general and local laws and joint resolutions; the printing and binding of all reports, documents and other matters bound in book or pamphlet form and all miscellaneous printing and binding necessary for the several documents not otherwise provided for in KRS

57.011

to

57.151

.

Second-class printing is lithographic or offset printing and engraving and embossing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 176, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Constitutional provisions as to public printing, Ky. Const., §§ 40, 247.

Election ballots, printing of, KRS

117.145

.

Highways, Department of, printing and dissemination of information concerning highways not controlled by this chapter, KRS

176.055

.

Index of vital records, KRS

213.031

.

Journals, house and senate to publish, Ky. Const., § 40.

Libraries and Archives, Department for, may issue printed material, KRS

171.140

.

Public printing and binding to be let to lowest bidder, Ky. Const., § 247.

Record books and supplies of circuit clerks, procurement, KRS

30A.080

.

State law library, sale, exchange or other disposal of books by state law librarian, KRS

27A.210

.

Unemployment Insurance Commission, reports, rules, and unemployment compensation act to be published, KRS

341.150

.

57.020.
Duties of Superintendent of Public Printing; contracts for work not covered by regular contracts; qualification to perform work; bond of printer. [Repealed.]

57.021.
Printing by state agency — Restrictions.

In the event that the Commonwealth or any of its agencies has a printing or duplicating plant or letter press, it may print any class of printing described in KRS

57.011

for the use of it or any other state agencies with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Such state owned facilities shall not print, under contract or otherwise, for agencies, persons, entities, or other groups or associations outside of state government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 176, § 3.

57.030.
Classes of printing, binding, printing paper, stationery and supplies. [Repealed.]

57.031.
State printing under control of Finance and Administration Cabinet — Qualifications of buyer. [Repealed.]

57.035.
State use of soybean oil printing ink — When cost effective.

Recognizing that ink produced from soybean oil is biodegradable with no known negative environmental impact, and that the state’s farmers are economically distressed and need additional income, it is the public policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that state agencies shall use printing ink produced from soybean oil if the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet determines that it is cost effective. The secretary shall make the determination of cost effectiveness each year. If the secretary determines the use of soybean oil ink is cost effective, he shall implement procedures requiring its use for printing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

57.040.
Contracts; who may bid for. [Repealed.]

57.041.
Requisitions for printing. [Repealed.]

57.045.
Printing by state educational institutions for own use. [Repealed.]

57.050.
Printing work must be approved by Department of Finance. [Repealed.]

57.051.
Printing specifications. [Repealed.]

57.060.
Paper and supplies, by whom furnished. [Repealed.]

57.061.
Advertisement for bids. [Repealed.]

57.070.
Advertisement for bids. [Repealed.]

57.071.
Bond of bidders — Condition. [Repealed.]

57.080.
Samples of paper to be used. [Repealed.]

57.081.
Restraint of competitive bidding. [Repealed.]

57.090.
Bids; sealing, addressing, delivery, preservation. [Repealed.]

57.091.
Contracts approved by Governor.

All work under the provisions of KRS

57.011

shall be performed under contract, to be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, provided, however, that approval by the Governor shall be required for each award of contract. One (1) or more contracts may be awarded for each class of printing. The number of contracts required shall be as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be in the best interest of the Commonwealth. The determination of content for each award and the period thereof shall be made by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. No contract shall be awarded to a member of the General Assembly or to any officer of the Commonwealth who is in any way interested in any such contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 176, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 110, § 99, effective January 1, 1979.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Governor, approval of contracts, Ky. Const., § 247.

57.100.
Bond of bidder. [Repealed.]

57.101.
Execution of orders, required when — Transportation costs, payment.

All successful bidders under KRS

57.011

to

57.151

shall promptly execute all orders issued to them by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The Acts and the Journals of the General Assembly shall be printed and bound and delivered respectively within sixty (60) days and one hundred eighty (180) days after the end of the session to the Legislative Research Commission for distribution, under the penalty of forfeiture of the bond of the contractors. The Finance and Administration Cabinet may on good cause shown by the contractors, extend the time for not more than thirty (30) days for executing any work.

All transportation of paper, copy, proof or printed sheets, and finished work shall be paid for by the contractor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 176, § 11.

57.110.
Contract, how awarded; proof of adequate equipment. [Repealed.]

57.111.
Paper furnished by the printer — Bills for paper or stationery — Form. [Repealed.]

57.120.
Cancellation of contract. [Repealed.]

57.121.
Rejection of work — Reprinting. [Repealed.]

57.130.
Bribing of bidder. [Repealed.]

57.131.
Title to plates and art work. [Repealed.]

57.140.
Number of copies printed and bound. [Repealed.]

57.141.
Cancellation of contract — Grounds. [Repealed.]

57.150.
Specifications for printing and binding; amount of work, how estimated. [Repealed.]

57.151.
Legislative Research Commission to provide copy and indexes of legislative acts.

The Legislative Research Commission shall furnish a correct copy of the acts and resolutions and the journals of the General Assembly to the printer. The clerk of each house of the General Assembly shall promptly furnish to the printer copies of bills, reports, resolutions, and other papers.

The Legislative Research Commission shall prepare indexes to the acts of the General Assembly and the journals of the Senate and House and have the acts proofread by the enrolled bills. The Commission shall refer to the section number affected for any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or of the Rules of Practice amended or repealed by any act. The printing rate shall be established in the contract for printing the basic documents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 176, §§ 14, 15; 1966, ch. 255, § 62.

57.160.
Manuscript of laws and legislative documents to be furnished to printer. [Repealed.]

57.170.
Indexes and sidenotes to Acts and journals. [Repealed.]

57.180.
Time in which work to be completed. [Repealed.]

57.190.
Copy of work and account filed with Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

57.200.
Itemized statement of contractor; payment. [Repealed.]

57.210.
Contractor to pay for transportation if work not done at capital. [Repealed.]

57.220.
Newspaper advertisements; where published; rates. [Repealed.]

57.230.
Composition; rates for. [Repealed.]

57.240.
Presswork and folding; rates. [Repealed.]

57.250.
Binding (including sewing); rates. [Repealed.]

57.260.
Ruling and binding blank book work; rates. [Repealed.]

57.270.
Biennial report of Department of Finance to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

57.280.
Biennial report of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to General Assembly. [Repealed.]

57.285.
Printing for political subdivisions to be done within such subdivision. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 133; repealed by 2019 ch. 44, § 35, effective June 27, 2019.

57.290.
Legislative Research Commission to distribute public books.

The acts of the General Assembly and the journals of each house shall, upon being printed, be delivered to the Legislative Research Commission, and distributed by it. The Commission shall prepare for each county a package containing the acts and journals, with a list of the persons entitled to receive them, and send one (1) package in the most inexpensive manner to the circuit clerk of each county, who shall distribute the books to those entitled to them.

History.

2433, 2444: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 156, § 2; 1954, ch. 42, § 14.

57.300.
Acts of General Assembly, who entitled to copies.

The following officers and libraries are entitled free of charge to copies of the Acts of the General Assembly, as they are published: members of the General Assembly that passed the acts, the Governor, the State Treasurer, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, justices and judges of the Court of Justice, Commonwealth’s attorneys, and county attorneys, one (1) copy each; the Attorney General, four (4) copies; the Legislative Research Commission, for the use of the Senate, five (5) copies, and for the use of the House of Representatives, ten (10) copies; the State Law Library, nine (9) copies; the judge of each federal court for Kentucky, one (1) copy; the United States Court of Appeals at Cincinnati, one (1) copy; the Supreme Court of the United States, one (1) copy; the law library of each county, one (1) copy; the law library of the University of Kentucky, three (3) copies; the law library of the University of Louisville, three (3) copies; the Northern Kentucky University Chase Law School library, three (3) copies; the Library of Congress, five (5) copies; the Kentucky Historical Society, one (1) copy; the Department for Libraries and Archives, two (2) copies; and each of the state universities in Kentucky, two (2) copies.

History.

2421, 2422, 2426a, 2426b: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 150, § 1; 1954, ch. 42, § 15; 1968, ch. 152, § 23; 1976, ch. 62, § 53; 1982, ch. 316, § 2, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cooperative library services with other states, KRS

171.221

.

57.310.
House and Senate journals, who entitled to copies — Affirmative response required prior to receipt.

Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following officers and libraries are entitled free of charge to copies of the journals of each house of the General Assembly, as they are published: each member of the General Assembly, one (1) copy for the session in which he served; the law library of each county, one (1) copy; the Governor and Secretary of State, one (1) copy each; the State Law Library, two (2) copies; the Legislative Research Commission, five (5) copies for the use of the Senate and five (5) copies for the use of the House of Representatives; the law library of the University of Kentucky, the law library of the University of Louisville, the Library of Congress, the Kentucky Historical Society, the Department for Libraries and Archives, and each of the state universities in Kentucky, two (2) copies each.

Prior to printing the journals, the Legislative Research Commission shall inquire of those entitled to a free copy of the journals under subsection (1) of this section:

Whether the officer or library wishes to receive the free copy or copies to which entitled; and

If the officer or library desires to receive a free copy, whether the officer or library prefers to receive it in print or electronic format.

Unless those entitled to a free copy of the journals respond affirmatively to the inquiry required by subsection (2) of this section, they shall not receive a free copy or copies of the journals.

History.

2425, 2426a, 2426b: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 150, § 2; 1954, ch. 42, § 16; 1968, ch. 152, § 24; 1982, ch. 316, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 132, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

57.320.
Purchase and distribution of bound volumes and advance sheets of opinions of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals.

The state law librarian, under direction of the Supreme Court, shall purchase bound volumes and advance sheets of the opinions of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals and furnish them for the use of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, each county law library, and each judge of a Circuit Court.

History.

2426, 2426a, 2426b: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 156, § 3; 1954, ch. 42, § 17; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 16, effective January 2, 1978.

57.330.
Acts of Congress, who entitled to copies of.

Each member of the General Assembly, each judge and each clerk of a state court, the Attorney General, each Commonwealth’s attorney, each county attorney, the Legislative Research Commission, the Kentucky Historical Society, and the State Law Library are each entitled, upon requesting it, to one (1) copy of the Acts of Congress sent to the state for distribution.

History.

2428: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 42, § 18.

57.340.
Statutes, rules, and compilation of administrative regulations, how furnished to Circuit or District Judges.

On a certificate from any Circuit Judge or District Judge that he does not have a copy of the latest revision of the statutes and annotations thereto, rules of practice and procedure, or compilation of administrative regulations, or that his copy has been lost, mutilated, or torn, the state law librarian shall furnish to the judge a copy of the publication needed and shall furnish from time to time supplements issued to these publications. The law librarian shall certify the cost of such books to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall issue its warrant on the State Treasurer for the amount, payable out of funds appropriated for that purpose.

History.

2432: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 42, § 19; 1956, ch. 236; 1968, ch. 152, § 25; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 35, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

57.350.
Burning of courthouse — Books replaced free of charge.

If any county courthouse containing the law library is destroyed by fire, the Legislative Research Commission shall, upon receipt of the affidavit of the county judge/executive showing the loss, furnish to the county acts of the General Assembly and journals of the House of Representatives and Senate, and the state law librarian shall furnish bound volumes of the opinions of the Court of Justice, if available.

History.

2432a: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 156, § 4; 1954, ch. 42, § 20; 1976, ch. 62, § 54.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

County law library, trustees of may purchase books to replace those lost, mutilated or destroyed, KRS

172.130

.

57.360.
Custody and care of public books.

Any public officer, except a member of the General Assembly, who receives any books from the state shall hold them as public property and as an appendage to his office, and deliver them to his successor. Each officer shall take good care of the books delivered to him.

History.

2423, 2424.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Books sent to county officials to be part of county law library, KRS

172.100

,

172.110

,

172.170

.

57.370.
State-owned books to be marked for identification.

When deemed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to be desirable or necessary, consistent with all relevant factors concerning acquisition and use, all public books of the state shall be designated as public property by placing on the title page, “Property of the State of Kentucky,” and the binder shall press those words on the cover. The words, “Property of the Commonwealth of Kentucky,” may also be used for such purpose. Each officer who is charged with possession of books acquired under this chapter shall write or otherwise designate in or on each book the name of the office to which it belongs, if such books are to be retained permanently by such officer or his agency.

History.

2427: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 129, § 1.

57.375.
Agency preparing documents to be identified — State expense noted when.

All public documents printed under this chapter shall indicate the office of the unit preparing the document; in addition, any document distributed without charge shall indicate that the cost of printing was paid from state funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 129, § 2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The discretion given to the director of purchases under this section relates exclusively to public books and the “property of” requirement applies automatically to all documents where the cost of printing is paid from state funds and where they are distributed without charge.

OAG 66-641

.

The word “distributed” does not apply to documents where the distribution is required by law.

OAG 66-641

.

Travel folders, highway maps and other documents which are voluntarily distributed to members of the public should contain the required statement.

OAG 66-641

.

Local governments and agencies engaged in a tourist promotion program and receiving state matching funds from the Department of Public Information under its cooperative advertising program need not indicate on their printed promotional materials that printing costs have been paid in whole or in part from state funds.

OAG 77-25

.

57.380.
Clerks to account for books — Liability for loss. [Repealed.]

57.390.
Unsolicited mailings by state agencies — Publications to be submitted to Legislative Research Commission and General Assembly online.

As used in this section:

“Publication” means any annual or biennial report, book, pamphlet, newsletter, bulletin, map, calendar, or brochure, of a documentary or informational nature, whether or not required by statute. The term does not include news releases; notices, agendas, or minutes of meetings; or budgets and budget recommendations; and

“State agency” means any executive branch organizational unit or administrative body, as defined in KRS

12.010

, or any agency of the legislative branch of state government.

A state agency shall not mail a publication to any person who has not requested a copy of the publication unless the unsolicited mailing is:

Used to market or advertise an agency, event, site, program, or service; or

Determined, in writing, to be essential to the performance of the agency’s statutory mission by:

The Governor, if the state agency is in the executive branch; or

The General Assembly or the Legislative Research Commission, if the state agency is in the legislative branch.

The Governor may delegate responsibility under subsection (2) of this section to the secretaries of the program cabinets for publication of state agencies within or attached to their respective cabinets.

If any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes requires a state agency to submit a publication annually or biennially to the Legislative Research Commission or to the General Assembly, the state agency shall submit that publication online rather than on paper or by means of any other printed medium.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 42, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

57.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]